District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.06a

Quarterly report on status of Medicaid eligibility.

Beginning February 1, 2012, the Department shall issue quarterly reports on the status of the Money Follows the Person program. The report shall include the following:

(1)

The number of applications submitted for Medicaid;

(2)

The number of applications approved for Medicaid; and

(3)

The amount of money obtained from Medicaid.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 106a
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5064, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, §§ 22, 23, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 clarified that D.C. Law 19-21, § 5064, added D.C. Law 15-335, § 106a; and substituted “the Department shall” for “DYRS shall” in the introductory language.